Vermont, session 2025-2026, H745.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. chapter 141 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 141. PEACE OFFICERS
* * *
§ 2223. FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Child care facility” has the same meaning as in 33 V.S.A. § 3511.
(2) “Employee” means any person engaged in service to an employer at
a sensitive location for wages, salary, or other compensation, and includes an
independent contractor.
(3) “Federal immigration authority” means a federal agency or
department, along with its employees or contractors, tasked with enforcement
of immigration law and border entry, including the Department of Homeland
Security, Immigration and Customs Enforcement, and U.S. Customs and
Border Protection.
(4) “Health care facility” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A.
§ 9402(6).
VT LEG #386386 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.745
2026 Page 3 of 11
(5) “Polling place” is a location approved for an election conducted in
the State.
(6) “Public library” has the same meaning as in 22 V.S.A. § 101.
(7) “School” means a public school or an independent school approved
pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 166 and includes colleges and universities.
(8) “Sensitive location” means a school, health care facility, polling
place, public library, or child care facility.
(b) Immigration authorities on site.
(1) No employee at a sensitive location, unless presented with a judicial
warrant, shall grant access to a federal immigration authority:
(A) into a nonpublic area of the sensitive location; or
(B) to any records of an individual that are maintained at the sensitive
location.
(2) A supervisor of a sensitive location shall:
(A) be the primary authority to review a judicial warrant presented by
a federal immigration authority at the sensitive location; and
(B) designate at least one other employee to serve as a designee of
the supervisor in the event that the supervisor is not present when a federal
immigration authority appears at the sensitive location.
Sec. 2. MODEL POLICY FOR SENSITIVE LOCATIONS; GUIDANCE TO
EMPLOYERS
VT LEG #386386 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.745
2026 Page 4 of 11
(a) The Human Rights Commission, in consultation with the Office of the
Attorney General, shall publish a model policy on or before April 15, 2027,
that provides guidance on how sensitive locations as defined in 20 V.S.A
§ 2223 can limit assistance to a federal immigration authority to the fullest
extent possible. The policy shall be consistent with federal and State law and
also ensure that all sensitive locations remain safe and accessible to all State
residents regardless of immigration status. All sensitive locations shall adopt
the Human Rights Commission’s model policy, or an equivalent, pursuant to
this subsection not later than six months after the publication of the model
policy.
(b) On or before June 15, 2027, the Human Rights Commission, in
consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, shall publish
documentation that provides guidance to private sector employers about the
rights of employers to not comply with a federal immigration authority in
nonpublic areas of their place of business when the authority lacks a judicial
warrant.
Sec. 3. 28 V.S.A. § 101 is amended to read:
§ 101. POWERS OF THE DEPARTMENT
The Department is charged with the following powers:
(1) to establish, maintain, and administer such State correctional
facilities and programs as may be required for the custody, control,
VT LEG #386386 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.745
2026 Page 5 of 11
correctional treatment, and rehabilitation of committed persons, and for the
safekeeping of such other persons as may be committed to the Department in
accordance with law;
(2) to operate diagnostic and treatment programs and such other
programs deemed desirable to treat persons committed to the Department and
to further other purposes and objectives of this title;
(3) to administer the supervision of persons placed on probation and
released on parole and to administer probation and parole services;
(4) to employ such officers, employees, and agents as deemed necessary
to discharge the functions of the Department;
(5) to establish standards for the management, operation, personnel, and
program of all correctional facilities in the State;
(6) to act in an advisory capacity in assisting law enforcement agencies,
except federal immigration authorities, and communities in the prevention of
crime and delinquency;
(7) to enforce and administer such other laws as may be vested in the
Department;
(8) to enter into agreements for assistance in support of the operation of
jails or lockups in accordance with criteria established by the Department, and
to use the jails or lockups as provided in this title, except agreements or
cooperative arrangements to assist federal immigration authorities;
VT LEG #386386 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.745
2026 Page 6 of 11
(9) notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State and the
Department shall not be responsible for the expense of detaining a person in
custody except as provided in this title; and
(10) to charter, establish, and fund through grants such municipal
entities or nonprofit organizations as may be required for providing crime
prevention and restorative justice programs for offenders, victims of crime, and
the public.
Sec. 4. 28 V.S.A. § 102(b) is amended to read:
(b) The Commissioner is charged with the following powers:
* * *
(8) To cooperate with and accept funds from the federal government or
any agency thereof, except any federal immigration authority, for the purpose
of exercising the powers and responsibilities stated in this section.
* * *
Sec. 5. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS; FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AUTHORITIES; CURRENT COOPERATION; TERMINATION
(a)(1) The Department of Corrections shall provide a written report
detailing the existence and scope of the agreements or cooperation with, or
assistance provided to federal immigration authorities, including any financial
and resource implications.
VT LEG #386386 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.745
2026 Page 7 of 11
(2) The report identified in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
submitted to the House Committees on Corrections and Institutions and on
Government Operations and Military Affairs and the Senate Committees on
Institutions and on Government Operations within 30 days after passage of this
act.
(b) The Department of Corrections shall terminate any existing contracts or
agreements with federal immigration authorities within 30 days after passage
of this act except as required by federal law.
Sec. 6. 16 V.S.A. chapter 33 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 33. FIRE AND EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS DRILLS
AND, SAFETY PATROLS, AND PRIVACY
* * *
§ 1486. IMMIGRATION-RELATED PROTOCOLS
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Federal immigration authority” means a federal agency or
department, along with its employees or contractors, tasked with enforcement
of immigration law and border entry, including the Department of Homeland
Security, Immigration and Customs Enforcement, and U.S. Customs and
Border Protection.
VT LEG #386386 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.745
2026 Page 8 of 11
(2) “School” means a public school or an independent school approved
under section 166 of this title and includes employees and independent
contractors working for the school.
(b) Privacy.
(1) A school shall not collect information or any documents regarding
the citizenship or immigration status of a student or a family member of a
student, except as required by State or federal law or as required to administer
a State or federally supported educational program.
(2) A superintendent or representative of the school district shall report
to the school board as soon as practicable any attempt of a federal immigration
authority to gain information of a student or family member of a student or
access to a school for the purpose of enforcing immigration law.
Sec. 7. 12 V.S.A. § 3577 is amended to read:
§ 3577. PRIVILEGE FROM ARREST
(a) The Governor, Lieutenant Governor, State Treasurer, Secretary of State,
Auditor of Accounts, Attorney General, and members of the General Assembly
and officers and witnesses whose duty it is to attend thereon, in all cases except
treason, felony, and breach of the peace, shall be privileged from arrest and
VT LEG #386386 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.745
2026 Page 9 of 11
imprisonment during their necessary attendance on and in going to and
returning from the General Assembly.
(b) A party or witness in a cause pending in any court in the State or before
special masters, auditors, referees, or commissioners, and a witness in a
criminal cause pending in any such court, shall not be arrested, imprisoned, or
detained by virtue of civil process. Any witness summoned from outside the
State in a criminal cause, pending in any court within the State, shall be
privileged from the service of papers of any kind whatsoever, and from arrest
for any cause while going to, attending at, or returning from such court or trial
of such cause.
(c)(1) Prohibition. A person shall not be subject to civil arrest while
traveling to, entering, remaining at, or returning from:
(A) a court proceeding; or
(B) a building owned or operated by a public agency as defined in 1
V.S.A. § 317.
(2) Exceptions. Subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not apply to:
(A) an arrest pursuant to a judicially issued warrant or a court order;
(B) an arrest for contempt of the court where the proceeding is
occurring; or
(C) an arrest to maintain order or safety in the court where the
proceeding is occurring.
VT LEG #386386 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.745
2026 Page 10 of 11
(3) Remedies.
(A) A person who violates this subsection (c) by knowingly and
willfully executing or assisting with an arrest prohibited by subdivision (1) of
this subsection (c) shall be subject to contempt proceedings and may be liable
in a civil action for false imprisonment.
(B) A person who is arrested in violation of subdivision (1) of this
subsection (c) may bring a civil action against the violator for damages;
injunctive, equitable, or declaratory relief; punitive damages; and reasonable
costs and attorney’s fees.
(C) The Office of the Attorney General may bring a civil action on
behalf of the State of Vermont for appropriate injunctive, equitable, or
declaratory relief if there is reasonable cause to believe that a violation of
subdivision (1) of this subsection (c) has occurred or will occur.
(D) No action under this subsection (c) shall be brought against the
Judiciary or any of its members or employees for actions taken to maintain
order or safety in the courts.
(E) This section shall not be construed to limit or infringe upon any
right, privilege, or remedy available under common law or any other provision
of law or rule.
VT LEG #386386 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.745
2026 Page 11 of 11
(F) Notwithstanding section 3578 of this title, the protections and
remedies afforded by this subsection (c) apply irrespective of when the
privilege against civil arrest is invoked.
(4) Definition. As used in this subsection, “civil arrest” means an arrest
for purposes of obtaining a person’s presence or attendance at a civil
proceeding, including an immigration proceeding.
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386386 v.1